Nebraska, session 109, LB863.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB863 LB863
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Department means the Department of Correctional Services; and
(b) Facility means any facility operated by the department that is:
(i) Classified by the department as Maximum A, Maximum B, or Medium,
as such classifications existed on January 1, 2026; or
(ii) Substantially similar to a facility described in subdivision
(1)(b)(i) of this section that is constructed or operated after the
effective date of this act.
(2) If state-owned property on which a facility is located is within
one hundred yards of any residential property line, the department shall
construct a solid and continuous physical barrier at any such abutting
property line. Such barrier shall be designed to:
(a) Reduce noise and visual intrusion into adjoining residential
properties;
(b) Improve neighborhood safety and privacy; and
(c) Deter trespassing and unauthorized contact between inmates,
facility visitors, and residents.
(3) This section applies to facilities in existence on the effective
date of this act and to facilities constructed or operated on or after
the effective date of this act.
-2-